Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.010

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide for more effective and efficient management of the forest and land resources in the state by consolidating into a department of natural resources certain powers, duties and functions of the division of forestry of the department of conservation and development, the board of state land commissioners, the state forest board, all state sustained yield forest committees, director of conservation and development, state capitol committee, director of licensing, secretary of state, director of revenue, and commissioner of public lands.

[ 1979 c 107 s 4; 1965 c 8 s 43.30.010. Prior: 1957 c 38 s 1.]